Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,110
Obedience to peace officers; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly fails or refuses to obey any lawful order of any peace officer who is controlling or directing traffic shall be guilty of a traffic infraction.

(2) Any person who knowingly fails to obey any lawful order of a peace officer shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor whenever such order is given in furtherance of the apprehension of a person who has violated the Nebraska Rules of the Road or of a person whom such officer reasonably believes has violated the rules.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-604;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 206.

A person driving in response to a lawful order by a law enforcement officer is engaged in privileged conduct for which he cannot be punished. Fulmer v. Jensen, 221 Neb. 582, 379 N.W.2d 736 (1986).

One who drives in response to the lawful order of a law enforcement officer engages in privileged conduct and may not be punished for so doing. State v. Lichti, 219 Neb. 894, 367 N.W.2d 138 (1985).